New Jersey, session 221, A2301.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    A person commits a crime of the fourth degree if, with the purpose to harass another, the person tampers or interferes with any software, computer, cell phone, or any other electronic device. For purposes of this section, electronic device shall include,  but not be limited to, a smart home device or system, home security system, computer, digital camera, wireless or portable equipment, entertainment system, or any other device that is capable of transmitting, receiving, or recording messages, images, sounds, data, or other information by electronic means. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.